Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-359
Applications for spousal support or alimony; financial statements.

Applications for spousal support or alimony shall be accompanied by a statement of the applicant's financial condition and, to the best of his or her knowledge, a statement of the other party's financial condition. Such other party may file his or her statement, if he or she so desires, and shall do so if ordered by the court. Statements shall be under oath and shall show income from salary or other sources, assets, debts and payments thereon, living expenses, and other relevant information. Required forms for financial statements may be furnished by the court.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB554, § 31;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 31.

The filing of a financial statement as required under this section is waived if the parties proceed without objection to hearing and trial without such filing. Danielson v. Danielson, 204 Neb. 776, 285 N.W.2d 494 (1979).